Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 7. Restrictions On Employment By Or Operation Of Child Care Facilities By Registered Sex Offenders.

§ 43-15-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(i) “Child care service” means any school, business or volunteer service that is:

1. Licensed by the state to perform child care; or

2. Involves the care, instruction or guidance of minor children where a fee is charged for the care, instruction, guidance or participation of a child in the program or activity offered by the school, business or service; or

Any public school.

“Child care service employer” means every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting a child care service.

“Applicant” means any person who is being considered for employment or as a volunteer by a child care service employer.

“Convicted” means an adjudication of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere.

“Sex offense” shall have the meaning ascribed in Section 45-33-23.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 450, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 43-15-303.
Operators of child care service prohibited from employing registered sex offenders; penalties for violations.

A child care service employer offering or conducting a child care service:

Shall not employ or permit to volunteer an applicant who is listed on the sex offender registry as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25; and

Shall not knowingly employ or permit to volunteer an applicant who has been convicted of a sex offense, who has been adjudicated not guilty of a sex offense by reason of insanity; or who has been adjudicated physically or mentally incompetent.

A child care service employer who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), imprisoned for a period not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

An employer who obtains an official report from the Mississippi Justice Information Center that the applicant is not registered as a sex offender shall not be guilty of a violation of this section, absent the employer’s actual knowledge that the applicant is a sex offender.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 450, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 43-15-305.
Registered sex offenders prohibited from owning or operating child care services; penalties for violations.

A person required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25 may not own or operate a child care service. Any person who is required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25 who knowingly owns or operates a child care service is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a period not to exceed five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 450, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2006.

§ 43-15-307.
Registered sex offenders prohibited from working for or volunteering at child care services; penalties for violations.

A person required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25 may not be employed by or volunteer at a child care service. Any person who is required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25 who knowingly undertakes employment or volunteer service with a child care service is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a period not to exceed five (5) years.

Any person who knowingly fails to inform a child care service employer of a prior conviction of a sex offense when applying or volunteering for any child care service, or who applies for employment or as a volunteer for any child care service, knowing that the person is required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25, shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a period not to exceed five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 450, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2005.